Maine, session 132, LD434.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1610-R is enacted to read:
§1610-R. Additional securities; legislative branch
Notwithstanding any limitation on the amount of securities that may be issued pursuant
to section 1606, subsection 2, the authority may issue additional securities in an amount
not to exceed $8,000,000 outstanding at any one time for paying the costs associated with
planning, purchasing, customizing and implementing an integrated electronic legislative
management system to replace the existing system for the Senate and the House of
Representatives.
Page 1 - 132LR0963(03)